en: Party Streamers & Curtains
xx: Party Streamers & Curtains
cs: Girlandy a party závěsy
da: Serpentiner og foliegardiner
de: Partygirlanden & -vorhänge
es: Cortinillas y guirnaldas
fr: Banderoles et rideaux de fête
it: Tende a fili e stelle filanti
ja: パーティーストリーマー・カーテン
nl: Slingers en feestgordijnen
no: Festoppheng og pyntespiraler
pl: Serpentyny i zasłony
pt: Cortinas e fitas para festas
ru: Серпантин и праздничные занавески
sv: Serpentiner och draperier
tr: Parti Flamaları ve Perdeleri

en: Party Supply Kits
xx: Party Supply Kits
cs: Sady party materiálu
da: Sæt med festtilbehør
de: Partyzubehörsets
es: Kits para fiestas
fr: Kits d'articles de fête
it: Kit di articoli per feste
ja: パーティー用品キット
nl: Feestbenodighedensets
no: Festutstyrssett
pl: Zestawy akcesoriów na przyjęcia
pt: Kits de acessórios para festas
ru: Наборы для вечеринок
sv: Partytillbehörssatser
tr: Parti Malzeme Setleri

en: Piñatas
xx: Piñatas
cs: Piňaty
da: Piñataer
de: Piñatas
es: Piñatas
fr: Piñatas
it: Piñatas
ja: くす玉・ピニャータ
nl: Piñata's
no: Piñataer
pl: Piniaty
pt: Piñatas
ru: Пиньяты
sv: Piñatas
tr: Pinyatalar

en: Place Card Holders
xx: Place Card Holders
cs: Stojánky na jmenovky
da: Bordkortholdere
de: Platzkartenhalter
es: Soportes de tarjetas de colocación de invitados
fr: Porte-noms
it: Supporti segnaposto
ja: 座席カードホルダー
nl: Houders voor tafelschikkingskaartjes
no: Bordkortholdere
pl: Stojaki na winietki
pt: Porta-cartões
ru: Держатели для табличек
sv: Placeringskorthållare
tr: Yer Kartı Kutuları

en: Place Cards
xx: Place Cards
cs: Jmenovky na stůl
da: Bordkort
de: Platzkarten
es: Tarjetas de ubicación
fr: Marque-places
it: Segnaposti
ja: 座席カード
nl: Plaatskaarten
no: Bordkort
pl: Winietki
pt: Cartões marcadores de mesa
ru: Именные карточки для официальных приемов
sv: Placeringskort
tr: Yer Kartları

en: Response Cards
xx: Response Cards
cs: Odpovědní karty
da: Svarkort
de: Antwortkarten
es: Tarjetas de confirmación
fr: Cartes de réponse
it: Biglietti di risposta
ja: 返信カード
nl: Antwoordkaarten
no: Svarkort
pl: Kartki z odpowiedzią
pt: Cartões de resposta
ru: Карточки для ответов на приглашения
sv: Svarskort
tr: Kutlama Kartları

en: Sparklers
xx: Sparklers
cs: Prskavky
da: Stjernekastere
de: Wunderkerzen
es: Bengalas
fr: Cierges magiques
it: Scintilline
ja: 線香花火
nl: Sterretjes
no: Stjerneskudd
pl: Zimne ognie
pt: Sparklers
ru: Бенгальские огни
sv: Tomtebloss
tr: Maytaplar

en: Special Occasion Card Boxes & Holders
xx: Special Occasion Card Boxes & Holders
cs: Krabice a držáky na přání
da: Kortæsker og -holdere
de: Halter für Karten zu besonderen Anlässen
es: Cajas y soportes para ocasiones especiales
fr: Urnes pour occasions spéciales
it: Contenitori per biglietti e portainviti
ja: 記念日カードホルダー
nl: Dozen en houders voor speciale kaarten
no: Esker for kort til spesielle anledninger
pl: Stojaki i pojemniki na kartki z życzeniami
pt: Caixas e porta-cartões para ocasiões especiais
ru: Коробки и держатели для праздничных открыток
sv: Etuier och hållare för högtidskort
tr: Özel Etkinlik Davetiyesi Kutuları ve Kapları

en: Spray String
xx: Spray String
cs: Konfety ve spreji
da: Spraykonfetti
de: Luftschlangenspray
es: Aerosoles de serpentinas
fr: Bombes fil serpentin
it: Stelle filanti spray
ja: パーティースプレー
nl: Slingers in spuitbus
no: Serpentinspray
pl: Serpentyna w sprayu
pt: Spray serpentina
ru: Баллончики с серпантином
sv: Silly string
tr: İp Spreyleri

en: Special Effects
xx: Special Effects
cs: Speciální efekty
da: Specialeffekter
de: Visuelle Effekte
es: Efectos especiales
fr: Effets visuels
it: Effetti visivi
ja: 特殊効果演出
nl: Visuele effecten
no: Spesialeffekter
pl: Efekty specjalne
pt: Efeitos visuais
ru: Товары для спецэффектов
sv: Specialeffekter
tr: Özel Efektler

en: Disco Balls
xx: Disco Balls
cs: Diskotékové koule
da: Discokugler
de: Diskokugeln
es: Bolas de discoteca
fr: Boules disco
it: Palle da discoteca
ja: ミラーボール
nl: Discoballen
no: Diskokuler
pl: Kule dyskotekowe
pt: Globo de pista de dança
ru: Шары для дискотек
sv: Diskokulor
tr: Disko Topları

en: Fog Machines
xx: Fog Machines
cs: Výrobníky mlhy
da: Røgmaskiner
de: Nebelmaschinen
es: Máquinas de humo
fr: Machines fumigènes
it: Macchine della nebbia
ja: スモークマシン
nl: Rookmachines
no: Tåkemaskiner
pl: Maszyny do mgły
pt: Máquinas de fumaça
ru: Дымовые машины
sv: Dimmaskiner
tr: Duman Makineleri

en: Special Effects Controllers
xx: Special Effects Controllers
cs: Zařízení na ovládání speciálních efektů
da: Specialeffekter – styring
de: Lichtmischpulte
es: Controladores de efectos especiales
fr: Contrôleurs d'effets spéciaux
it: Controller effetti speciali
ja: 特殊効果機材
nl: Bedieningssystemen voor visuele effecten
no: Spesialeffektkontrollere
pl: Kontrolery efektów specjalnych
pt: Controladores de efeitos especiais
ru: Системы управления спецэффектами
sv: Kontroller för specialeffekter
tr: Özel Efekt Kumanda Aygıtları

en: Special Effects Light Stands
xx: Special Effects Light Stands
cs: Stojany na světla pro speciální efekty
da: Stativer til lysudstyr
de: Ständer für Lichteffektbeleuchtung
es: Soportes para iluminación de efectos especiales
fr: Supports pour effets spéciaux lumineux
it: Supporto luci per effetti speciali
ja: 特殊効果ライトスタンド
nl: Statieven voor effectverlichting
no: Lysstativ for spesialeffekter
pl: Stojaki do lamp specjalnych
pt: Suportes para luzes de efeitos especiais
ru: Стойки для компонентов осветительной системы
sv: Stativ för specialeffektslampor
tr: Özel Efekt Işığı Standları

en: Special Effects Lighting
xx: Special Effects Lighting
cs: Světla pro speciální efekty
da: Specialeffekter – lys
de: Lichteffektbeleuchtung
es: Efectos de iluminación
fr: Jeux de lumière
it: Luci per effetti visivi
ja: 演出照明
nl: Visuele effecten: verlichting
no: Spesialeffektlys
pl: Oświetlenie specjalne
pt: Iluminação de efeitos visuais
ru: Осветительные приборы для спецэффектов
sv: Specialeffektlampor
tr: Özel Efekt Işıkları

en: Trophies & Awards
xx: Trophies & Awards
cs: Trofeje a ceny
da: Trofæer og præmier
de: Trophäen & Preise
es: Trofeos y premios
fr: Trophées et récompenses
it: Trofei e premi
ja: トロフィー・表彰用品
nl: Trofeeën en prijzen
no: Pokaler og premier
pl: Trofea i nagrody
pt: Troféus e premiações
ru: Призы и награды
sv: Pokaler och priser
tr: Ödüller ve Hatıralar

en: Award Certificates
xx: Award Certificates
cs: Certifikáty na ocenění
da: Præmiebeviser
de: Preiszertifikate
es: Diplomas para premios
fr: Certificats de récompense
it: Certificati di premiazione
ja: 賞状
nl: Certificaten
no: Premiediplomer
pl: Certyfikaty
pt: Certificados de premiação
ru: Наградные сертификаты
sv: Belöningscertifikat
tr: Sertifikalar

en: Award Pins & Medals
xx: Award Pins & Medals
cs: Špendlíky a medaile na ocenění
da: Præmieemblemer og medaljer
de: Preis-Anstecknadeln & -Medaillen
es: Pines y medallas para premios
fr: Pin's et médailles
it: Spille e medaglie
ja: アワードピン・メダル
nl: Prijsspelden en medailles
no: Premienåler og medaljer
pl: Przypinki i medale
pt: Pins e medalhas de premiação
ru: Значки и медали
sv: Belöningsnålar och medaljer
tr: Rozetler ve Madalyalar

en: Award Plaques
xx: Award Plaques
cs: Plakety na ocenění
da: Præmieplatter
de: Preisplaketten
es: Placas para premios
fr: Plaques de récompenses
it: Targhe di premiazione
ja: アワードプラーク・表彰盾
nl: Plaquettes
no: Premieplaketter
pl: Tabliczki
pt: Placas de premiação
ru: Наградные плакетки
sv: Belöningsplakett
tr: Plaketler

en: Award Ribbons
xx: Award Ribbons
cs: Stuhy na ocenění
da: Præmiebånd
de: Preisbänder
es: Cintas para premios
fr: Rubans de récompense
it: Coccarde
ja: アワードリボン・ロゼット
nl: Prijslinten
no: Premiesløyfer
pl: Wstęgi
pt: Fitas de premiação
ru: Наградные розетки
sv: Belöningsband
tr: Nişanlar